District of Columbia statutes.
38-823.03

Mandatory reporting.

On or before June 30 of each year, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall submit to the Mayor, the Council, and the Healthy Schools and Youth Commission a comprehensive report on the District’s farm-to-school initiatives and recommendations for improvement.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 303, 57 DCR 4779
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 4062(h), 59 DCR 8025
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 substituted “June 30” for “September 30.”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4062(h) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4062(h) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
Section 4063 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that § 4062 of the act shall apply as of June 20, 2012.